Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.411

Grain indemnity fund program—Fund established—Contents, deposits, disbursements, use.

(1) There is hereby established a fund to be known as the grain indemnity fund. The grain indemnity fund shall consist of assessments remitted by licensees pursuant to the provisions of RCW 22.09.416 through 22.09.426.

(2) All assessments shall be paid to the department and shall be deposited in the grain indemnity fund. The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the grain indemnity fund. Disbursements shall be on authorization of the director. No appropriation is required for disbursements from this fund.

(3) The grain indemnity fund shall be used exclusively for purposes of paying claimants pursuant to this chapter, and paying necessary expenses of administering the grain indemnity fund, provided however, that moneys equivalent to one-half of the interest earned by the fund for deposit to the general fund may be paid to the department to defray costs of administering the warehouse audit program. The state of Washington shall not be liable for any claims presented against the fund.

[ 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 67; 1987 c 509 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Severability—1987 c 509: See note following RCW 22.09.060.